Washington statutes.
RCW 9A.60.030

Obtaining a signature by deception or duress.

(1) A person is guilty of obtaining a signature by deception or duress if by deception or duress and with intent to defraud or deprive he or she causes another person to sign or execute a written instrument.

(2) Obtaining a signature by deception or duress is a class C felony.

[ 2011 c 336 s 383; 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 38 s 14; 1975 1st ex.s. c 260 s 9A.60.030.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Severability—1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 38: See notes following RCW 9A.08.020.